Washington statutes.
RCW 18.85.101

Broker's license—Requirements—Renewal.

(1) The minimum requirements for an individual to receive a broker's license are that the individual:

(a) Is 18 years of age or older;

(b) Has a high school diploma or its equivalent;

(c) Except as provided in RCW 18.85.141, has furnished proof, as the director may require, that the applicant has successfully completed 90 hours of instruction in real estate. Instruction must include courses as prescribed by the director including fundamentals, which shall include three hours of instruction on fair housing and consumer protection issues, and practices. Each course must be completed within two years before applying for the broker's license examination and be approved by the director. The applicant must pass a course examination, approved by the director for each course used to satisfy the broker's license requirement; and

(d) Has passed the broker's license examination.

(2) The broker's license may be renewed upon completion of continuing education courses and payment of the renewal fee as prescribed by the director. The education requirements for the first renewal of the broker's license must include 90 hours of courses as prescribed by the director, including real estate law, which shall include three hours of instruction on fair housing and consumer protection issues, advance practices, and continuing education.

(3) The broker is licensed to one firm at a time and is supervised by a designated or managing broker.

[ 2021 c 288 s 2; 2008 c 23 s 11; 1994 c 291 s 1; 1985 c 162 s 1; 1972 ex.s. c 139 s 8; 1953 c 235 s 5; 1951 c 222 s 7; 1941 c 252 s 15; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 8340-38. Formerly RCW 18.85.090.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2021 c 288: See note following RCW 18.85.211.

Effective date—1994 c 291: "This act shall take effect July 1, 1995." [ 1994 c 291 s 5.]